Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2207
Record of service of summons; entry as evidence.

The clerk of the court shall, upon the return of every summons served, enter upon the record the name of the defendant or defendants summoned and the day of the service upon each one. The entry shall be evidence of the service of the summons in case of the loss thereof.

R.S.1867, Code § 886, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8555;

C.S.1922, § 9506;

C.S.1929, § 20-2207;

R.S.1943, § 25-2207;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 37.